Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1049.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.1a of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wrongful Life


Act”.





Req. No. 614 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.1b of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A physician or other health care professional shall not


prescribe to or perform on any individual under eighteen (18) years


of age:


1. Gender transition surgery;


2. Hormone therapy; or


3. Puberty-blocking drugs, unless such drugs are medically


necessary. For the purpose of this paragraph, a gender transition


shall not constitute medical necessity.


B. A person may bring an action against a physician or other


health care professional who prescribed or performed gender


transition surgery, hormone therapy, or puberty-blocking drugs if


the gender transition surgery, hormone therapy, or puberty-blocking


drugs caused the person to not be able to enjoy the natural


reproductivity functions of childbearing and rearing that the person


would have enjoyed if not for the gender transition surgery, hormone


therapy, or puberty-blocking drugs.


C. If the person is under eighteen (18) years of age, he or she


may bring an action throughout his or her minority through a parent


or legal guardian, and may bring an action in his or her own name


upon reaching majority.



Req. No. 614 Page 2


D. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there shall


be no time limitation for the commencement of an action brought


under this section except as provided by this subsection.


2. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the plaintiff,


based solely on his or her age, would be capable of bearing children


if not for the gender transition surgery, hormone therapy, or


puberty-blocking drugs.


3. If the presumption described in paragraph 2 of this


subsection is successfully rebutted, the court shall dismiss the


cause of action.


E. A plaintiff who establishes a violation of subsection A of


this section and who can show that he or she has suffered harm as


described in subsection B of this section may be granted:


1. Compensatory damages appropriate to the loss of natural


reproductivity functions as described in subsection B of this


section;


2. Punitive damages; or


3. Any other appropriate relief.


F. A plaintiff who establishes a violation of subsection A of


this section and who can show that he or she has suffered harm as


described in subsection B of this section shall recover court costs


and reasonable attorney fees.





Req. No. 614 Page 3


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.1c of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A parent or legal guardian shall not consent, on behalf of


any individual under eighteen (18) years of age for whom the parent


or legal guardian has the authority to make medical decisions, to


the prescription or performance of the following treatments by a


physician or other health care professional:


1. Gender transition surgery;


2. Hormone therapy; or


3. Puberty-blocking drugs, unless such drugs are medically


necessary. For the purpose of this paragraph, a gender transition


shall not constitute medical necessity.


B. If a person received gender transition surgery, hormone


therapy, or puberty-blocking drugs while such person was under


eighteen (18) years of age and if the gender transition surgery,


hormone therapy, or puberty-blocking drugs caused the person to not


be able to enjoy the natural reproductivity functions of


childbearing and rearing that the person would have enjoyed if not


for the gender transition surgery, hormone therapy, or puberty-


blocking drugs, the person may bring an action against his or her


parent or legal guardian who consented to the gender transition


surgery, hormone therapy, or puberty-blocking drugs on behalf of the


minor.

Req. No. 614 Page 4


C. If the person is under eighteen (18) years of age, he or she


may bring an action:


1. Throughout his or her minority through a parent or legal


guardian, provided that the parent or legal guardian is not the same


parent or legal guardian who consented to the gender transition


surgery, hormone therapy, or puberty-blocking drugs on behalf of the


minor; and


2. In his or her own name upon reaching majority.


D. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there shall


be no time limitation for the commencement of an action brought


under this section except as provided by this subsection.


2. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the plaintiff,


based solely on his or her age, would be capable of bearing children


if not for the gender transition surgery, hormone therapy, or


puberty-blocking drugs.


3. If the presumption described in paragraph 2 of this


subsection is successfully rebutted, the court shall dismiss the


cause of action.


E. A plaintiff who establishes a violation of subsection A of


this section and who can show that he or she has suffered harm as


described in subsection B of this section may be granted:


1. Compensatory damages appropriate to the loss of natural


reproductivity functions as described in subsection B of this


section;

Req. No. 614 Page 5


2. Punitive damages; or


3. Any other appropriate relief.


F. A plaintiff who establishes a violation of subsection A of


this section and who can show that he or she has suffered harm as


described in subsection B of this section shall recover court costs


and reasonable attorney fees.


G. In addition to the other remedies provided by this


subsection, a parent or legal guardian found to have violated


subsection A of this section, in cases where there are potentially


grave long-term effects on the child, shall, upon conviction, be


guilty of child abuse punishable as provided in Section 843.5 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.1d of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The violations, penalties, and remedies provided by this act


shall be in addition to those provided by Section 2607.1 of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes. This act shall not be construed to


supersede, replace, or abrogate any of the provisions of Section


2607.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-614 DC 1/16/2025 2:45:22 PM



Req. No. 614 Page 6